California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(f) In addition, if the applicant for a license is an individual, the application shall list all other names known as or used during the past 10 years and shall state that the applicant is to be personally and actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. If any other qualified manager is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by the applicant, under penalty of perjury. If any other person is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall also be subscribed, verified, and signed by that person under penalty of perjury.

(g) If the applicants for a license are copartners, the application shall state the true names and addresses of all partners and the name of the partner to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought and list all other names known as or used during the past 10 years. If a qualified manager
 other than a partner is to be actively in charge of the business, then the application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by all of the partners under penalty of perjury. If any other person is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall also be subscribed, verified, and signed by that person, under penalty of perjury, under penalty of perjury by all of the partners and the qualified manager, or by all of the partners or the qualified manager.

(h) If the applicant for a license is a corporation, the application shall state the true names and complete residence addresses of the chief executive officer, secretary, chief financial officer, and any other corporate officer who will be active in the business to be licensed. The application shall also state the name and address of the designated person to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and
 signed by a duly authorized officer of the applicant and by the qualified manager thereof, under penalty of perjury.

(i) If the applicant for a license is a limited liability company, the application shall state the true name and complete residence address of each member, manager, and any officer who will be active in the business to be licensed. A certified copy of the articles of organization, as filed by the Secretary of State, shall be supplied to the bureau upon request. In the case of a manager-managed limited liability company, the application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by a manager; otherwise, in the case of a member-managed limited liability company, the application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by a duly authorized member of the applicant and by the qualified manager thereof. The application shall also state whether any of the members, managers, officers, or the qualified manager has ever used an alias.

(j) Any other information, evidence, statements, or documents as may be required by the director.

(k) At the discretion of the applicant, a valid email address.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 23) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 13.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 14 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

7525.1.

An application shall be verified and shall include:

(a) The full name and business address of the applicant.

(b) The name under which the applicant intends to do business.

(c) A statement as to the general nature of the business in which the applicant intends to engage.

(d) A verified statement of their experience qualifications.

(e) (1) If the applicant is an individual, a qualified manager, a partner of a partnership, or an officer of a corporation designated in subdivision (h), one personal identification
 form provided by the bureau upon which shall appear a photograph taken within one year immediately preceding the date of the filing of the application together with two legible sets of fingerprints, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check, on a form approved by the Department of Justice, and a personal description of each person, respectively. The identification form shall include residence addresses and employment history for the previous five years and be signed under penalty of perjury.

(2) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants, excluding those submitted into an electronic fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.

(f) In addition, if the applicant for a license is an individual, the application shall
 list all other names known as or used during the past 10 years and shall state that the applicant is to be personally and actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. If any other qualified manager is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by the applicant, under penalty of perjury. If any other person is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall also be subscribed, verified, and signed by that person under penalty of perjury.

(g) If the applicants for a license are copartners, the application shall state the true names and addresses of all partners and the name of the partner to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought and list all other names known as or used during the past 10 years. If a qualified manager other than a partner is to be actively in charge of the business, then the application shall be
 subscribed, verified, and signed by all of the partners under penalty of perjury. If any other person is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall also be subscribed, verified, and signed under penalty of perjury by that person, by all of the partners and the qualified manager, or by all of the partners or the qualified manager.

(h) If the applicant for a license is a corporation, the application shall state the true names and complete residence addresses of the chief executive officer, secretary, chief financial officer, and any other corporate officer who will be active in the business to be licensed. The application shall also state the name and address of the designated person to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by a duly authorized officer of the applicant and by the qualified manager thereof, under penalty of perjury.

(i) Any other information, evidence, statements, or documents as may be required by the director.

(j) At the discretion of the applicant, a valid email address.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 24) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 14.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7525.2.

(a) An applicant for a qualified manager license shall satisfy all of the following requirements:

(1) Be at least 18 years of age.

(2) Demonstrate they meet the experience requirements specified in Sections 7541 and 7541.1.

(3) Complete and forward to the bureau a private investigator qualified manager license application on a form prescribed by the director and signed by the applicant.

(4) Submit to the bureau two recent photographs of the applicant of a type prescribed by the director, two classifiable sets of the applicant’s fingerprints or proof of
 completion of a live scan, and the applicant’s residence address and residence telephone number.

(5) Demonstrate passage of the private investigator licensing examination.

(6) Pay the required application and examination fees to the bureau, if applicable.

(b) The application form shall contain a statement informing the applicant that a false or dishonest answer to a question may be grounds for denial or subsequent suspension or revocation of a qualified manager license.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 3.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7525.3.

(a) The bureau shall require each applicant for a private investigator license and qualified manager, as defined in Sections 7512.6, 7512.7, and 7521, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the bureau shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for each individual applicant, if the applicant is an individual, each partner, if the applicant is a partnership, each officer, if the applicant is a corporation, each member and manager, if the applicant is a limited liability company, and each qualified manager, as defined in Sections 7512.7, 7512.14, 7512.15, and 7525.1.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 20.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7526.

Before an application for a license is granted, the applicant for a license or his or her qualified manager shall meet all of the following:

(a) Be at least 18 years of age.

(b) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a license under Section 480.

(c) Comply with the requirements specified in this chapter for the particular license for which an application is made.

(d) Comply with other qualifications as the director may fix by rule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 13.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7526.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may, in his or her sole discretion, grant a probationary license to an applicant subject to terms and conditions deemed appropriate by the director, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Continuing medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment.

(2) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(3) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(4) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and for purposes of this section, when deciding whether to grant a probationary license, the director shall request that an applicant with a dismissed conviction provide proof of that dismissal and shall give special consideration to applicants whose convictions have been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code.

(2) The director shall also take into account and consider any other reasonable documents or individual character references provided by the applicant that may serve as evidence of rehabilitation as deemed appropriate by the director.

(c) The director may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary license upon receipt of a petition from the applicant or licensee.

(d) For purposes of granting a probationary license to qualified new applicants, the director shall develop standard terms of probation that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A three-year limit on the individual probationary license.

(2) A process to obtain a standard license for applicants who were issued a probationary license.

(3) Supervision requirements.

(4) Compliance and quarterly reporting requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 675, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

7527.

The director may require an applicant or his or her qualified manager, to demonstrate his or her qualifications by a written or oral examination, or a combination of both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 14.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7527.1.

(a) When creating or updating the licensing examination required pursuant to Section 7527, the bureau shall consider all of the following:

(1) Including in the examination questions on the subject of laws relating to privacy and professional ethics.

(2) Supplementing the examination with a separate examination on the subject of professional ethics.

(b) If the bureau determines pursuant to subdivision (a) that a separate professional ethics examination is necessary, the bureau shall require that current licensees take the separate professional ethics examination if this requirement is appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 309, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7527.5.

Payment of the application fee prescribed by this chapter entitles an applicant or his or her qualified manager to one examination without further charge. If the person fails to pass the examination, he or she shall not be eligible for any subsequent examination except upon payment of the reexamination fee prescribed by this chapter for each subsequent examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 15.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7528.

The chief shall issue a license, the form and content of which shall be determined by the chief in accordance with Section 164. In addition, the chief shall issue a “Certificate of Licensure” to any licensee, upon request and upon the payment of the fee prescribed in Section 7570.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 9.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7528.5.

The license shall at all times be posted in a conspicuous place in the principal place of business of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7529.

(a) (1) Upon the issuance of and with each biennial renewal of a license, a license in the form of an enhanced photo identification card of the size, design, and content as may be determined by the director or the director’s designee shall be issued by the bureau to each licensee, as follows:

(A) If the licensee is an individual, the enhanced photo identification card shall be issued to the licensee and to the licensee’s qualified manager.

(B) If the licensee is a partnership, the enhanced photo identification card shall be issued to each partner of the partnership licensee active in the business and to the licensee’s qualified manager.

(C) If the licensee is a corporation, the enhanced photo identification card shall be issued to each officer active in the business and to the licensee’s qualified manager.

(D) If the licensee is a limited liability company, the enhanced photo identification card shall be issued to each member, officer, and manager of the licensee active in the business and to the licensee’s qualified manager.

(2) The enhanced photo identification card is evidence that the licensee is licensed pursuant to this chapter. The card shall contain the name of the licensee, license expiration date, and a photograph of the licensee. The enhanced photo identification card shall clearly state that the person is licensed as a private investigator or is the qualified manager or officer of the licensee. The enhanced photo identification card is to be
 composed of a durable material and may incorporate technologically advanced security features. The bureau may recover its costs in an amount sufficient to reimburse the department’s costs for furnishing the enhanced photo identification card. The fee charged shall not exceed the actual direct costs for system development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide this service. The total amount of costs shall be recovered by including that amount in the fee charged for the initial application of and renewal of licensure. When the position, office, or association with a licensee belonging to a person to whom a card is issued is terminated, the person shall surrender the card to the licensee and, within five days thereafter, the licensee shall mail or deliver the card to the bureau for cancellation. Every person, while engaged in any activity for which licensure is required, shall display the person’s valid enhanced photo identification card as provided by regulation.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 25) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 15.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 16 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

7529.

(a) Upon the issuance of and with each biennial renewal of a license, a license in the form of an enhanced photo identification card of the size, design, and content as may be determined by the director or the director’s designee shall be issued by the bureau to each licensee, as follows:

(1) If the licensee is an individual, the enhanced photo identification card shall be issued to the licensee and to the licensee’s qualified manager.

(2) If the licensee is a partnership, the enhanced photo identification card shall be issued to each partner of the partnership licensee active in the business and to the licensee’s qualified manager.

(3) If
 the licensee is a corporation, the enhanced photo identification card shall be issued to each officer active in the business and to the licensee’s qualified manager.

(4) If a licensee holds a qualified manager license, the enhanced photo identification card shall be issued to the qualified manager licensee.

(b) The enhanced photo identification card is evidence that the licensee is licensed pursuant to this chapter. The card shall contain the name of the licensee, license expiration date, and a photograph of the licensee. The enhanced photo identification card shall clearly state that the person is licensed as a private investigator or is the qualified manager or officer of the licensee. The enhanced photo identification card is to be composed of a durable material and may incorporate technologically advanced security features. The bureau may recover its costs in an amount
 sufficient to reimburse the department’s costs for furnishing the enhanced photo identification card. The fee charged shall not exceed the actual direct costs for system development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide this service. The total amount of costs shall be recovered by including that amount in the fee charged for the initial application of and renewal of licensure. When the position, office, or association with a licensee belonging to a person to whom a card is issued is terminated, the person shall surrender the card to the licensee and, within five days thereafter, the licensee shall mail or deliver the card to the bureau for cancellation. Every person, while engaged in any activity for which licensure is required, shall display the person’s valid enhanced photo identification card as provided by regulation.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 16.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7530.

(a) Except as provided in this section, a license issued under this chapter is not assignable.

(b) A licensee may apply to the chief for consent, and upon receipt of the consent and payment of the processing fee authorized by Section 7570, may assign a license to another business entity as long as the direct and indirect owners of the assignor own all of the assignee immediately after the assignment.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 669, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 18.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.   See version added by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2014, Ch. 669.)
-------------------------------------------

7531.

A licensee shall at all times be legally responsible for the good conduct in the business of each of his or her employees or agents, including his or her qualified manager.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 19.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7531.5.

Each licensee shall maintain a record containing information relative to his or her employees as may be prescribed by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7532.

(a) No licensee shall conduct a business under a fictitious or other business name unless and until the licensee has obtained the written authorization of the bureau to do so.

(b) The bureau shall not authorize the use of a fictitious or other business name which is so similar to that of a public officer or agency or of that used by another licensee that the public may be confused or misled thereby.

(c) The authorization shall require, as a condition precedent to the use of any fictitious name, that the licensee comply with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7.

(d) A
 licensee desiring to conduct their business under more than one fictitious business name shall obtain the authorization of the bureau in the manner prescribed in this section for the use of each name.

(e) The licensee shall pay a fee of at least seventy-five dollars ($75), which may be increased to not more than eighty-two dollars ($82), for each authorization to use an additional fictitious business name and for each change in the use of a fictitious business name. If the original license is issued in a nonfictitious name and authorization is requested to have the license reissued in a fictitious business name, the licensee shall pay a fee of at least seventy-five dollars ($75), which may be increased to not more than eighty-two dollars ($82), for the authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 10.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7533.

Each licensee shall file with the bureau the complete address of his or her principal place of business including the name and number of the street, or, if the street where the business is located is not numbered, the number of the post office box. The director may require the filing of other information for the purpose of identifying the principal place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7533.2.

(a) At the time of an initial application for licensure or reassignment, an applicant for an initial license or a licensee applying for reassignment of the license shall notify the bureau on the application for licensure or reassignment if the applicant or licensee is a limited
 liability company
 for the purposes of this chapter during the period of licensure. The bureau shall include this information on the Department of Consumer Affairs BreEZe License Verification Internet Web page.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 20.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7533.5.

(a) A licensee shall notify the bureau within 30 days of any change in its corporate officers required to be named pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 7525.1 or members or managers required to be named pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 7525.1, and of any addition of a new partner.

(b) Applications, on forms prescribed by the director, shall be submitted by all new officers, members or managers, and partners. The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if the director determines that the new officer, member or manager, or partner of a licensee has committed any of the acts constituting grounds to deny an application for a license or to take disciplinary action against a licensee pursuant to Section 7538 or 7538.5, respectively.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 27) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 17.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 18 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

7533.5.

(a) A licensee shall notify the bureau within 30 days of any change in its corporate officers required to be named pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 7525.1, and of any addition of a new partner.

(b) Applications, on forms prescribed by the director, shall be submitted by all new officers and partners. The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if the director determines that the new officer or partner of a licensee has committed any of the acts constituting grounds to deny an application for a license or to take disciplinary action against a licensee pursuant to Section 7538 or 7538.5, respectively.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 28) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 18.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7534.

Every advertisement by a licensee soliciting or advertising business shall contain his or her business name, business address or telephone number, and license number as they appear in the records of the bureau. For the purposes of this section, “advertisement” shall include any business card, stationery, brochure, flyer, circular, newsletter, fax form, printed or published paid advertisement in any media form, or telephone book listing. Every advertisement by a licensee soliciting or advertising their business shall contain his or her business name, business address or telephone number, and license number, as they appear in the records of the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7535.

(a) A licensee shall not advertise or conduct business from any location other than that shown on the records of the bureau as their principal place of business unless they have received a branch office certificate for the location after compliance with the provisions of this chapter and any additional requirements necessary for the protection of the public as the director may by regulation prescribe. A licensee shall notify the bureau in writing within 30 days after closing or changing the location of a branch office.

(b) The branch office certificate shall be posted below the private investigator operator’s license. The qualified manager certificate shall be posted below the branch office certificate.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7536.

(a) The business of each licensee shall be operated under the active direction, control, charge, or management, in this state, of the licensee, if they are qualified, or the person who is qualified to act as the licensee’s qualified manager, if the licensee is not qualified.

(b) No person shall act as a qualified manager of a licensee until they have complied with each of the following:

(1) Demonstrated their qualifications by a written or oral examination, or a combination of both, if required by the director.

(2) Made a satisfactory showing to the director that they have the qualifications prescribed in Section 7526
 and that none of the facts stated in Section 7538 or 7538.5 exist as to them.

(c) If the holder of a qualified manager certificate wishes to be associated with more than their own private investigator license, they shall apply to the bureau for a qualified manager license in accordance with Section 7525.2. A person shall not act as a qualified manager of more than five licensees. The person acting as a qualified manager shall possess a qualified manager license and share equally with the licensee the responsibility and any liability
 for the conduct of the business of the licensee and the actions of the employees and other personnel of the licensee. This section shall not apply to any licensee that notifies the bureau in writing that they are not conducting any business, but requests to maintain a current license status with the bureau. Whenever the licensee resumes conducting business, the licensee shall inform the bureau in writing within 30 days.

(d) Any person acting as a qualified manager of their own private investigator license shall be the holder of a qualified manager certificate issued by the bureau. The certificate shall be predominantly displayed below the private investigator’s license. Any person acting as qualified manager of an additional private investigator license shall be the holder of a qualified manager license issued by the bureau. A copy of the qualified manager license shall be predominantly displayed below the private investigator’s license. 

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7537.

(a) In case of the death of a person licensed as an individual, a member of the immediate family of the deceased licensee shall be entitled to continue the business under the same license for 120 days following the death of the licensee, provided that written application for permission is made to the bureau within 30 days following the death of the licensee. At the end of the 120-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled. If no request is received within the 30-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled at the end of that period.

(b) If the qualified manager ceases for any reason whatsoever to be connected with the
 licensee to whom the license is issued, the licensee shall notify the bureau in writing 30 days from this cessation. If the notice of cessation is filed timely, the license shall remain in force for a period of 90 days after cessation or for an additional period, not to exceed one year, as approved by the director, pending the qualification of another qualified manager as provided in this chapter. After the 90-day period or additional period, as approved by the director, the license shall be automatically suspended, unless the bureau receives written notification that the license is under the active charge of a qualified manager. If the licensee fails to notify the bureau within the 30-day period, his or her license shall be automatically suspended and may be reinstated only upon the filing of an application for reinstatement, payment of the reinstatement fee, and the qualification of a qualified
 manager as provided in this chapter.

(c) In the case of the death or disassociation of a partner of an entity licensed as a partnership, the licensee shall notify the bureau, in writing, within 30 days from the death or disassociation of the individual. If notice is given, the license shall remain in force for 90 days following the death or disassociation. At the end of this period the license shall be automatically canceled. If the licensee fails to notify the bureau within the 30-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled.

(d) A license extended under this section is subject to all other provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 569, Sec. 24.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7538.

(a) After a hearing the director may deny a license unless the applicant makes a showing satisfactory to the director that the applicant, if an individual, and the applicant’s qualified manager have not, or, if the applicant is a person other than an individual, that its qualified manager and each of its officers, partners, members, or managers have not:

(1) Committed any act that, if committed by a licensee, would be a ground for the suspension or revocation of a license under this chapter.

(2) Committed any act constituting dishonesty or fraud.

(3) Committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480,
 including illegally using, carrying, or possessing a deadly weapon.

(4) Been refused a license under this chapter or had a license revoked.

(5) Been an officer, partner, qualified manager, member, or manager of any person who has been refused a license under this chapter or whose license has been revoked.

(6) While unlicensed committed, or aided and abetted the commission of, any act for which a license is required by this chapter.

(7) Knowingly made any false statement in their application.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 29) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 19.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 20 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

7538.

(a) After a hearing the director may deny a license unless the applicant makes a showing satisfactory to the director that the applicant, if an individual, and the applicant’s qualified manager have not, or, if the applicant is a person other than an individual, that its qualified manager and each of its officers and partners have not:

(1) Committed any act that, if committed by a licensee, would be a ground for the suspension or revocation of a license under this chapter.

(2) Committed any act constituting dishonesty or fraud.

(3) Committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, including
 illegally using, carrying, or possessing a deadly weapon.

(4) Been refused a license under this chapter or had a license revoked.

(5) Been an officer, partner, or qualified manager of any person who has been refused a license under this chapter or whose license has been revoked.

(6) While unlicensed committed, or aided and abetted the commission of, any act for which a license is required by this chapter.

(7) Knowingly made any false statement in their application.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 30) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 20.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7538.5.

(a) The director may refuse to issue any license provided for in this chapter to any of the following:

(1) An individual who has had any license revoked, has a license currently under suspension, or failed to renew their license while under suspension.

(2) An individual who, while acting as a partner of a partnership, an officer or director of a corporation, or a member, manager, or officer of a limited liability company, had their license revoked, has a license currently under suspension, or failed to renew their license while under suspension.

(3) An individual who, while acting as a partner of the partnership, an officer, director of
 the corporation, or a member, manager, or officer of a limited liability company meets both of the following conditions:

(A) The individual was a partner of any partnership, an officer or director of any corporation, or a member, manager, or officer of any limited liability company whose license was revoked, is currently under suspension, or was not renewed while under suspension.

(B) While acting as a partner, officer, director, member, or manager, they participated in any of the prohibited acts for which the license was revoked or suspended.

(4) An individual who is serving or has served as the qualified manager for any licensee that has had its license revoked, is currently under suspension, or failed to renew while under suspension.

(b) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 31) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 21.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 22 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

7538.5.

(a) The director may refuse to issue any license provided for in this chapter to any of the following:

(1) An individual who has had any license revoked, has a license currently under suspension, or failed to renew their license while under suspension.

(2) An individual who, while acting as a partner of a partnership, or an officer or director of a corporation, had their license revoked, has a license currently under suspension, or failed to renew their license while under suspension.

(3) An individual, who, while acting as a partner of the partnership, or an officer or director of the corporation, meets both of the following
 conditions:

(A) The individual was a partner of any partnership, or an officer or director of any corporation, whose license was revoked, is currently under suspension, or was not renewed while under suspension.

(B) The individual, while acting as a partner, officer, or director, participated in any of the prohibited acts for which the license was revoked or suspended.

(4) An individual who is serving or has served as the qualified manager for any licensee that has had its license revoked, is currently under suspension, or failed to renew while under suspension.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 32) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 22.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7539.

(a) Any licensee or officer, director, partner, member, manager, or qualified manager of a licensee may divulge to any law enforcement officer or district attorney, or their representative, any information they may acquire as to any criminal offense, but they shall not divulge to any other person, except as otherwise required by law, any information acquired by them except at the direction of the employer or client for whom the information was obtained.

(b) A licensee or officer, director, partner, member, manager, qualified manager, or employee of a licensee shall not knowingly make any false report to their employer or client for whom information was being obtained.

(c) A written report shall not be
 submitted to a client except by the licensee, qualified manager, or a person authorized by one or either of them, and the person submitting the report shall exercise diligence in ascertaining whether or not the facts and information in the report are true and correct.
